California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) (1) The department shall apply for a waiver of federal law pursuant to Section 1396n of Title 42 of the United States Code to test the efficacy of providing a disease management benefit to beneficiaries under the Medi-Cal program. A disease management benefit shall include, but not be limited to, the use of evidence-based practice guidelines, supporting adherence to care plans, and providing patient education, monitoring, and healthy lifestyle changes.

(2) The waiver developed pursuant to this section shall be known as the Disease Management Waiver. The department shall submit any necessary waiver applications or modifications to the Medicaid State Plan to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to implement the Disease Management Waiver, and shall implement the waiver only to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(b) The Disease Management Waiver shall be designed to provide eligible individuals with a range of services that enable them to remain in the least restrictive and most homelike environment while receiving the medical care necessary to protect their health and well-being. Services provided pursuant to this waiver program shall include only those not otherwise available under the state plan, and may include, but are not limited to, medication management, coordination with a primary care provider, use of evidence-based practice
 guidelines, supporting adherence to a plan of care, patient education, communication and collaboration among providers, and process and outcome measures. Coverage for those services shall be limited by the terms, conditions, and duration of the federal waiver.

(c) Eligibility for the Disease Management Waiver shall be limited to those persons who are eligible for the Medi-Cal program as aged, blind, and disabled persons or those persons over 21 years of age who are not enrolled in a Medi-Cal managed care plan, or eligible for the federal Medicare program, and who are determined by the department to be at risk of, or diagnosed with, select chronic diseases, including, but not limited to, advanced atherosclerotic disease syndromes, congestive heart failure, and diabetes. Eligibility shall be based on the individual’s medical diagnosis and prognosis, and other criteria, as specified in the waiver.

(d) The Disease Management Waiver shall test the effectiveness of providing a Medi-Cal disease management benefit. The department shall evaluate the effectiveness of the Disease Management Waiver.

(1) The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, participant satisfaction, health and safety, the quality of life of the participant receiving the disease management benefit, and demonstration of the cost neutrality of the Disease Management Waiver as specified in federal guidelines.

(2) The evaluation shall estimate the projected savings, if any, in the budgets of state and local governments if the Disease Management Waiver was expanded statewide.

(3) The evaluation shall be submitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or
 before January 1, 2008.

(e) The department shall limit the number of participants in the Disease Management Waiver during the initial three years of its operation to a number that will be statistically significant for purposes of the waiver evaluation and that meets any requirements of the federal government, including a request to waive statewide implementation requirements for the waiver during the initial years of evaluation.

(f) In undertaking this Disease Management Waiver, the director may enter into contracts for the purpose of directly providing Disease Management Waiver services.

(g) The department shall seek all federal waivers necessary to allow for federal financial participation under this section.

(h) The Disease Management Waiver shall be
 developed and implemented only to the extent that funds are appropriated or otherwise available for that purpose.

(i) The department shall not implement this section if any of the following apply:

(1) The department’s application for federal funds under the Disease Management Waiver is not accepted.

(2) Federal funding for the waiver ceases to be available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 230, Sec. 71.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.28.

(a) If the department decides to terminate or not renew a health facility’s subacute care services provider contract, the department shall notify the health facility 30 days before the termination or nonrenewal becomes effective.

(b) (1) Once the department has notified the health facility pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall provide guidance to the health facility regarding expectations for the transfer of patients. The guidance shall
 consider the need to minimize trauma of a patient due to transfer, and shall ensure, prior to any transfer or discharge, that the facility has complied with the transfer and discharge requirements of Section 1336.2 of the Health and Safety Code, subsection (a) of Section 483.12 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any other state and federal laws applicable to the transfer and discharge of patients of a nursing facility, as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code. The department’s Medi-Cal division shall coordinate with the department’s Licensing and Certification Division in developing the guidance for the protection of patients’ transfer rights.

(2) Prior to any transfer, the health facility shall continue to provide the subacute level of services required by a patient and shall comply with state laws governing subacute staffing levels. The health facility shall continue to be paid commensurate
 with that subacute level of service. If the health facility fails to comply with applicable state laws regarding subacute staffing levels, the facility shall be paid at the facility’s Medi-Cal nursing facility rate.

(3) Any health facility that has a subacute services provider contract that has been terminated or has not been renewed may not be reimbursed commensurate with the subacute level of service for patients admitted after the contract is terminated or not renewed, unless and until the facility obtains a new subacute services provider contract. The facility may be reimbursed commensurate with the subacute level of service where the patient returns to the facility during the bed-hold period. Where the patient returns to the facility following the bed-hold period, the facility shall be reimbursed at the facility’s Medi-Cal nursing facility rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.29.

(a) A health facility that has a subacute services provider contract with the department under this chapter shall comply with the patient transfer and discharge requirements of this section.

(b) Before patients are transferred due to any change in the status of the license or operation of the facility, including the termination of the subacute services provider contract by the department, the facility shall comply with the transfer and discharge requirements of Section 1336.2
 of the Health and Safety Code, subsection (a) of Section 483.12 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any other state and federal laws applicable to the transfer and discharge of patients of a nursing facility, as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) All of the rights and procedures that apply to the appeal of the transfer or discharge of a nursing facility patient pursuant to the sections cited in subdivision (b) shall apply to an appeal pursuant to this subdivision. The facility shall ensure that each patient and patient’s representative is notified of this right to appeal. The notification shall be in writing and shall be communicated in a language and manner that is understood by the patient or patient’s representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 443, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.3.

In addition to any other criteria as provided in subdivision (p) of Section 14132, no reimbursement shall be made pursuant to this chapter for any service in a general acute care hospital for which a special permit or a supplemental service approval is required pursuant to Section 1256.1 of the Health and Safety Code unless that general acute care hospital has first obtained a special permit or a supplemental service approval from the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.34.

(a) Human milk and human milk derivatives supplied by a mothers’ milk bank for human consumption are a covered service under this chapter.

(b) For purposes of this section, “mothers’ milk bank” means any person, firm, or corporation which engages in the not-for-profit procurement, processing, storage, distribution, or use of human milk, contributed by volunteer donors, in compliance with standards prescribed by the Human Milk Banking Association of North America.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 956, Sec. 3.   Effective September 19, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.35.

(a) Outpatient rehabilitation services are covered under this chapter, subject to utilization controls.

(b) The department and the Medi-Cal field offices shall not discriminate against elderly recipients in authorizing services under this section, and shall recognize the importance of rehabilitation services in allowing elderly persons to remain independent and at home.

(c) Rehabilitation services may be provided in group settings, including what is referred to as stroke centers which offer programs and
 group training for adults in therapeutic exercise, activities of daily living, speech remediation, or counseling.

(d) In order to be eligible for reimbursement under this section, stroke centers shall be certified as participating providers and meet the rules and regulations of the department. Stroke centers shall meet the requirements for licensure of either adult day health care centers or outpatient rehabilitation clinics.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1360, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.36.

(a) Community health worker services are a covered Medi-Cal benefit.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Community health worker” means a liaison, link, or intermediary between health and social services and the community to facilitate access to services and to improve the access and cultural competence of service delivery. A community health worker is a frontline health worker either trusted by, or who has a close understanding
 of, the community served. Community health workers include Promotores, Promotores de Salud, Community Health Representatives, navigators, and other nonlicensed health workers, including violence prevention professionals. A community health worker’s lived experience shall align with and provide a connection to the community being served.

(2) “Supervising provider” is an enrolled Medi-Cal provider that is authorized to supervise a community health worker pursuant to the federally approved Medicaid state plan amendment and that ensures that a community health worker meets the qualifications as required by the department. The supervising provider directly or indirectly oversees community health workers and the services that they deliver to Medi-Cal members.

(c) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall engage in outreach and education efforts to enrollees in a form
 and manner as directed by the department. At a minimum, the department shall require a Medi-Cal managed care plan to provide the following information to an enrollee:

(1) A description of the community health worker services benefit, including eligibility and coverage criteria.

(2) A list of providers that are authorized to refer an enrollee to community health worker services, and an explanation of how to request a referral.

(3) A list of contracted community health worker entities, including community-based organizations, community clinics, local health jurisdictions, licensed providers, clinics, or hospitals available to provide community health worker services, updated at least annually.

(4) An email address, internet website, and telephone number
 for an enrollee to access to request additional information regarding community health worker services.

(d) The outreach and education efforts conducted by a Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to subdivision (c) shall meet cultural and linguistic appropriateness standards, as determined by the department.

(e) The Medi-Cal managed care plan shall notify providers about the community health worker services benefit, as set forth by the department.

(f) (1) No later than July 1, 2025, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall adopt policies and procedures to effectuate a billing pathway for supervising providers, including contracted hospitals, to claim for the provision of community health worker services to enrollees during an emergency department visit and an outpatient followup to an emergency
 department visit, that are consistent with guidance developed by the department pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) No later than July 1, 2025, the department shall, consistent with subdivision (g), develop guidance on policies and procedures to effectuate a billing pathway for supervising providers, including contracted hospitals, to claim for the provision of community health worker services to Medi-Cal members under the fee-for-service delivery system during an emergency department visit and as an outpatient followup to an emergency department visit.

(g) The department shall, through existing and regular stakeholder processes, inform stakeholders about, and accept input from stakeholders on, implementation of the community health worker services benefit.

(h) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that
 federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized, and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of policy letters, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 102.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.39.

Midwifery services provided by a licensed midwife shall be covered under this chapter, to the extent that federal financial participation is available, and, subject to utilization controls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1280, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.4.

Nurse-midwifery services provided by a certified nurse-midwife shall be covered under the provisions of this chapter, to the extent required by federal law, subject to utilization controls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 327, Sec. 229.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.41.

(a) Services provided by a certified nurse practitioner shall be covered under this chapter to the extent authorized by federal law, and subject to utilization controls. The department shall permit a certified nurse practitioner to bill Medi-Cal independently for his or her services. If a certified nurse practitioner chooses to bill Medi-Cal independently for his or her services, the department shall make payment directly to the certified nurse practitioner.

(b) For purposes
 of this section, “certified” means nationally board certified in a recognized specialty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.42.

Benefits under this chapter shall not be restricted for inpatient hospital care to a time period less than 48 hours following a normal vaginal delivery and less than 96 hours following delivery by caesarean section. However, coverage for inpatient hospital care may be for a time period less than 48 or 96 hours following a delivery if both of the following conditions are met:

(a) The decision to discharge the mother and newborn before the 48- or 96-hour time period is made by the treating physicians
 in consultation with the mother.

(b) A postdischarge followup visit for the mother and newborn within 48 hours of discharge, when prescribed by the treating physician, is also a covered benefit under this chapter. The visit shall be by a licensed health care provider whose scope of practice includes postpartum care and newborn care. The visit shall include, at a minimum, parent education, assistance and training in breast or bottle feeding, and the performance of any necessary maternal or neonatal physical assessments. The treating physician shall disclose to the mother the availability of a postdischarge visit, including an in-home visit, physician office visit, or plan facility visit. The treating physician, in consultation with the mother, shall determine whether the postdischarge visit shall occur at home, the plan’s facility, or the treating physician’s office after assessment of certain factors. These factors shall include, but not be
 limited to, the transportation needs of the family and environmental and social risks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 652, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.44.

(a) Targeted case management (TCM), pursuant to Section 1915(g) of the Social Security Act as amended by Public Law 99-272 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(g)), shall be covered as a benefit, effective January 1, 1995. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any local governmental agency to implement TCM.

(b) A local governmental agency may contract with the department to provide TCM services. The department shall not contract with local education agencies to provide case
 management services under this section.

(c) A local governmental agency may contract with any private or public entity to provide TCM services on its behalf under the conditions specified by the department in regulations.

(d) Each local governmental agency that provides TCM services shall have all of the following:

(1) Established procedures for performance monitoring.

(2) A countywide system to prevent duplication of services and to ensure coordination and continuity of care among providers of case management services provided to beneficiaries who are eligible to receive case management services from two or more programs.

(3) A fee mechanism effective January 1, 1995, specific to TCM
 services provided, which may vary by program.

(e) Subject to the requirements of federal law and regulations, a local governmental agency or an entity under contract with a local governmental agency may provide TCM services to one or all of the following groups of Medi-Cal beneficiaries, which shall be defined in regulation:

(1) High-risk persons.

(2) Persons who have language or other comprehension barriers.

(3) Persons on probation.

(4) Persons who have exhibited an inability to handle personal, medical, or other affairs.

(5) Persons abusing alcohol or drugs, or both.

(6) Adults at risk of institutionalization.

(7) Adults at risk of abuse or neglect.

(f) (1) A local governmental agency that elects to provide TCM services to the groups specified in subdivision (e) shall, for each fiscal year, for the purpose of obtaining federal Medicaid reimbursement, submit an annual cost report as prescribed by the department that certifies all of the following:

(A) The expenditure of 100 percent of the costs incurred for the provision of TCM services from the local governmental agency’s general fund or from any other funds allowed under federal law and regulation.

(B) The amount of funds expended on allowable TCM services.

(C) Its
 expenditures represent costs that are eligible for federal financial participation.

(D) The costs reflected in the annual cost reports used to determine TCM rates are developed in compliance with the definitions contained in the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) Circular A-87.

(E) Case management services provided in accordance with Section 1396n(g) of Title 42 of the United States Code will not duplicate case management services provided under any home- and community-based services waiver.

(F) Claims for providing case management services pursuant to this section will not duplicate claims made to public agencies or private entities under other program authorities for the same purposes.

(G) The requirements of subdivision (d) have been met.

(2) The department shall deny any claim if it determines that any certification required by this subdivision is not adequately supported for purposes of federal financial participation.

(3) (A) A city that is not a local governmental agency, or any other local public entity that contracts with a local governmental agency pursuant to subdivision (c) and that is located within a county that is a participating local governmental agency pursuant to this section, may submit certification to the local governmental agency of amounts expended for TCM services in accordance with Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) A city or other local public entity that submits certification pursuant to this paragraph shall comply with the requirements of paragraph (1), with other
 requirements applicable to local governmental agencies that the department determines, in regulations, to be applicable, and with all applicable federal requirements.

(C) The local governmental agency shall forward the city’s or local public entity’s certification to the department for purposes of claiming federal financial participation.

(D) As applicable, the local governmental agency shall obtain and retain appropriate certifications from the expending city or local public entity, together with documentation of the underlying expenditures, as required by the department.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f), only a local governmental agency may submit TCM service claims to the department for the performance of TCM services.

(h) The department, in consultation with local governmental agencies, and consistent with federal regulations, and the State Medicaid Manual of the Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, shall adopt regulations that define TCM services, establish the standards under which TCM services qualify as a Medi-Cal reimbursable service, prescribe the methodology for determining the rate of reimbursement, and establish a claims submission and processing system and method to certify local expenditures.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the state shall be held harmless, in accordance with paragraphs (2) and (3) from any federal audit disallowance and interest resulting from payments made by the federal Medicaid Program as reimbursement for claims for providing TCM services pursuant to this section, for the disallowed claim.

(2) To the extent that a federal audit disallowance and interest results from a claim or claims for which any local governmental agency has received reimbursement for TCM services, the department shall recoup from the local governmental agency that submitted that disallowed claim, through offsets or by a direct billing, amounts equal to the amount of the disallowance and interest, in that fiscal year, for the disallowed claim. All subsequent claims submitted to the department applicable to any previously disallowed claim, may be held in abeyance, with no payment made, until the federal disallowance issue is resolved.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), to the extent that a federal audit disallowance and interest results from a claim or claims for which the local governmental agency has received reimbursement for TCM services performed by an entity under contract with, and on
 behalf of, the participating local governmental agency, the department shall be held harmless by that particular local governmental agency for 100 percent of the amount of any such federal audit disallowance and interest, for the disallowed claim.

(j) The expenditure of local funds required by this section shall not create, lead to, or expand the health care funding obligations or service obligations for current or future years for each local governmental agency, except as required by this section or as may be required by federal law.

(k) Subject to the requirements of federal law and regulations, TCM services are services which assist beneficiaries to gain access to needed medical, social, educational, and other services. Services provided by local governmental agencies, and their subcontractors, shall be defined in regulation, and shall include at least one of the
 following:

(1) Assessment.

(2) Plan development.

(3) Linkage and consultation.

(4) Assistance in accessing services.

(5) Periodic review.

(6) Crisis assistance planning.

(l) As a condition of participation and in consideration of the joint effort of the local governmental agencies and the department in implementing this section and the ongoing need of local governmental agencies to receive technical support from the department, as well as assistance in claims processing and program monitoring, the local governmental agencies shall cover the costs of the
 administrative activities performed by the department. Each local governmental agency shall annually pay a portion of the total costs of administrative activities performed by the department through a mechanism agreed to by the department and the local governmental agencies, or if no agreement is reached by August 1 of each year, directly to the state. The department shall determine and report the staffing requirements upon which projected costs will be based. Projected costs shall include the anticipated salaries, benefits, and operating expenses necessary to administer targeted case management.

(m) For the purposes of this section a “local governmental agency” means a county or chartered city.

(n) Nothing in this section or in Section 14132.47 shall be construed to prevent any state agency from providing TCM services or from contracting with others to provide these
 services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 464, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.45.

Regulations implementing, interpreting, or making specific the provisions of subdivision (z) of Section 14132 shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1555, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.46.

Pursuant to Sections 14024 and 14124.90, the Director of Health Services may recover for the cost of targeted case management services rendered under Section 14132.44 to eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries, from any person, corporation, or partnership who, at the time services are rendered, has a contractual or legal obligation to pay for the services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 532, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.47.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide local governmental agencies the choice of participating in either or both of the Targeted Case Management (TCM) and Administrative Claiming process programs at their option, subject to the requirements of this section and Section 14132.44.

(b) The department may contract with each participating local governmental agency or each local educational consortium to assist with the performance of administrative activities necessary for the proper and efficient administration of the Medi-Cal program, pursuant to Section 1903a of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396b(a)), and this activity shall
 be known as the Administrative Claiming process.

(c) (1) Subject to the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), as a condition for participation in the Administrative Claiming process, each participating local governmental agency or each local educational consortium shall, for the purpose of claiming federal Medicaid reimbursement, enter into a contract with the department and shall certify to the department the total amount the local governmental agency or each local educational consortium expended on the allowable administrative activities.

(2) The department shall deny the claim if it determines that the certification is not adequately supported, or does not otherwise comply with federal requirements, for purposes of claiming federal financial
 participation.

(d) Each participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium may subcontract with private or public entities to assist with the performance of administrative activities necessary for the proper and efficient administration of the Medi-Cal program under the conditions specified by the department in regulations.

(e) Each Administrative Claiming process contract shall include a requirement that each participating local governmental agency or each local educational consortium submit a claiming plan in a manner that shall be prescribed by the department in regulations, developed in consultation with local governmental agencies.

(f) (1) The department shall require that each
 participating local governmental agency or each local educational consortium certify to the department both of the following:

(A) The expenditure of 100 percent of the cost of performing Administrative Claiming process activities. The funds expended for this purpose shall be from the local governmental agency’s general fund or the general funds of local educational agencies or from any other funds allowed under federal law and regulation.

(B) In each fiscal year that its expenditures represent costs that are eligible for federal financial participation for that fiscal year. The department shall deny the claim if it determines that the certification is not adequately supported for purposes of federal financial participation.

(2) (A) (i) A city that is not a participating local governmental agency, or any other local public entity, that contracts with a local
 governmental agency pursuant to subdivision (d) and that is located within a county that is a participating local governmental agency pursuant to this section, may submit certification to the local governmental agency of amounts expended for Administrative Claiming services in accordance with Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ii) A city or other local public entity that submits certification pursuant to this paragraph shall comply with the requirements of paragraph (1), with other requirements applicable to local governmental agencies that the department determines, in regulations, to be applicable, and with all applicable federal requirements.

(iii) The local governmental agency shall forward the city’s or local public entity’s
 certification to the department for the purposes of claiming federal financial participation.

(iv) As applicable, the local governmental agency shall obtain and retain appropriate certifications from the expending city or local public entity, together with documentation of the underlying expenditures, as required by the department.

(B) A tribe or tribal organization, as defined in subdivision (n), that is not participating in Administrative Claiming process activities as a local governmental agency, may contract with, and submit to a tribe or tribal organization that is contracting with, the department pursuant to subdivision (b) amounts expended for Administrative Claiming process activities that it is certifying in accordance with Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations
 and other applicable federal law and regulations. The tribe or tribal organization receiving the certification shall forward it to the department for purposes of claiming federal financial participation. The certification shall comply with all of the requirements for certification set forth in subparagraph (A).

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the state shall be held harmless, in accordance with paragraphs (2) and (3), from any federal audit disallowance and interest resulting from payments made to a participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium pursuant to this section, for the disallowed claim.

(2) To the extent that a federal audit disallowance and interest results from a claim or claims for which any
 participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium has received reimbursement for Administrative Claiming process activities, the department shall recoup from the local governmental agency or local educational consortium that submitted the disallowed claim,
 through offsets or by a direct billing, amounts equal to the amount of the disallowance and interest, in that fiscal year, for the disallowed claim. All subsequent claims submitted to the department applicable to any previously disallowed administrative activity or claim, may be held in abeyance, with no payment made, until the federal disallowance issue is resolved.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), to the extent that a federal audit disallowance and interest results from a claim or claims for which the participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium has received reimbursement for Administrative Claiming process activities performed by an entity under contract with, and on behalf of, the participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium, the department shall be held
 harmless by that particular participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium for 100 percent of the amount of the federal audit disallowance and interest, for the disallowed claim.

(h) The use of local funds required by this section shall not create, lead to, or expand the health care funding obligations or service obligations for current or future years for any participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium, except as required by this section or as may be required by federal law.

(i) The department shall deny any claim from a participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium if the department determines that the claim is not adequately supported in accordance with criteria established pursuant to this subdivision and
 implementing regulations before it forwards the claim for reimbursement to the federal Medicaid Program. In consultation with local governmental agencies and local educational consortia, the department shall adopt regulations that prescribe the requirements for the submission and payment of claims for administrative activities performed by each participating local governmental agency and local educational consortium.

(j) Administrative activities shall be those determined by the department to be necessary for the proper and efficient administration of the state’s Medicaid plan and shall be defined in regulation.

(k) If the department denies any claim submitted under this section, the affected participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium may, within 30
 days after receipt of written notice of the denial, request that the department reconsider its action. The participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium may request a meeting with the director or his or her designee within 30 days to present its concerns to the department after the request is filed. If the director or his or her designee cannot meet, the department shall respond in writing indicating the specific reasons for which the claim is out of compliance to the participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium in response to its appeal. Thereafter, the decision of the director shall be final.

(l) To the extent consistent with federal law and regulations, participating local governmental agencies or local educational consortium may claim the actual costs of nonemergency, nonmedical
 transportation of Medi-Cal eligibles to Medi-Cal covered services, under guidelines established by the department, to the extent that these costs are actually borne by the participating local governmental agency or local educational consortium. A local educational consortium may only claim for nonemergency, nonmedical transportation of Medi-Cal eligibles for Medi-Cal covered services, through the Medi-Cal administrative activities program. Medi-Cal medical transportation services shall be claimed under the local educational agency Medi-Cal billing option, pursuant to Section 14132.06.

(m) As a condition of participation in the Administrative Claiming process and in recognition of revenue generated to each participating local governmental agency and each local educational consortium in the Administrative Claiming process, each participating
 local governmental agency and each local educational consortium shall pay an annual participation fee through a mechanism agreed to by the state and local governmental agencies and local educational consortia, or, if no agreement is reached by August 1 of each year, directly to the state. The participation fee shall be used to cover the cost of administering the Administrative Claiming process, including, but not limited to, claims processing, technical assistance, and monitoring. The department shall determine and report staffing requirements upon which projected costs will be based. The amount of the participation fee shall be based upon the anticipated salaries, benefits, and operating expenses, to administer the Administrative Claiming process and other costs related to that process.

(n) (1) For the purposes of this
 section, “participating local governmental agency” means a county, chartered city, Native American Indian tribe, tribal organization, or subgroup of a Native American Indian tribe or tribal organization, under contract with the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) Each participating Native American Indian tribe, tribal organization, or subgroup of a Native American Indian tribe or tribal organization may claim, as a Medi-Cal Administrative Activity,
 facilitating Medi-Cal applications, which includes, but is not limited to, using the California Healthcare Eligibility, Enrollment, and Retention System.

(o) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a local educational agency, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 14132.06, that participates under the Administrative
 Claiming process as a subcontractor to the local educational consortium in its service region.

(p) (1) For purposes of this section, “local educational consortium” means a local agency that is one of the service regions of the California County Superintendent Educational Services Association.

(2) Each local educational consortium shall contract with the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(q) (1) Each participating local educational consortium shall be responsible for the local educational agencies in its service region that participate in the Administrative Claiming process. This responsibility includes, but is not limited to, the preparation and